Washington statutes.
RCW 38.20.040

Rental of property, armories, and small arms ranges.

All armories and small arms ranges and all property, real or personal, used by the national guard and not owned by the state of Washington or the United States, shall be leased or rented to the state upon such terms and conditions as shall be approved by the commander-in-chief.

[ 1989 c 19 s 34; 1909 c 134 s 98; RRS s 8599.]